North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 26. Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology.

§ 120-230.
Creation and purpose of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology.

There is established the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology. The Committee shall review current information technology that impacts public policy, including electronic data processing and telecommunications, software technology, and information processing. The goals and objectives of the Committee shall be to develop electronic commerce in the State and to coordinate the use of information technology by State agencies in a manner that assures that the citizens of the State receive quality services from all State agencies and that the needs of the citizens are met in an efficient and effective manner. The Committee shall examine, on a continuing basis, systemwide issues affecting State government information technology, including, but not limited to, State information technology operations, infrastructure, development, financing, administration, and service delivery. The Committee may examine State agency or enterprise-specific information technology issues. The Committee shall make ongoing recommendations to the General Assembly on ways to improve the effectiveness, efficiency, and quality of State government information technology.

History.

1999-237, s. 22(a); 2004-129, s. 7A(b).

§ 120-231.
Committee duties; reports.

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology may:

Evaluate the current technological infrastructure of State government and information systems use and needs in State government and determine potential demands for additional information staff, equipment, software, data communications, and consulting services in State government during the next 10 years. The evaluation may include an assessment of ways technological infrastructure and information systems use may be leveraged to improve State efficiency and services to the citizens of the State, including an enterprise-wide infrastructure and data architecture.

Evaluate information technology governance, policy, and management practices, including policies and practices related to personnel and acquisition issues, on both a statewide and project level.

Study, evaluate, and recommend changes to the North Carolina General Statutes relating to electronic commerce.

Study, evaluate, and recommend action regarding reports received by the Committee.

Study, evaluate, and recommend any changes proposed for future development of the information highway system of the State.

The Committee may consult with the State Chief Information Officer on statewide technology strategies and initiatives and review all legislative proposals and other recommendations of the State Chief Information Officer.

The Committee shall submit annual reports to the General Assembly on or before the convening of the regular session of the General Assembly each year. The Committee may submit interim reports at any time it deems appropriate.

History.

1999-237, s. 22(a); 2004-129, ss. 7A(c), 36; 2006-264, s. 10.

§ 120-232.
Committee membership; terms; organization; vacancies.

The Committee shall consist of 16 members as follows:

Eight members of the Senate at the time of their appointment, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. At least two appointees shall be members of the Senate Appropriations Committee.

Eight members of the House of Representatives at the time of their appointment, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. At least two appointees shall be members of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee.

, (4) Repealed by Session Laws 2004-129, s. 7A(d), effective July 1, 2004.

Members of the Committee shall serve terms of two years beginning at the convening of the General Assembly in each odd-numbered year, with no prohibition against being reappointed, except initial appointments shall begin on appointment and end on the day of convening of the 2005 General Assembly.

Members may complete a term of service on the Committee even if they do not seek reelection or are not reelected, but resignation or removal from service constitutes resignation or removal from service on the Committee.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each select a legislative member from their appointees to serve as cochair of the Committee.

The Committee shall meet at least once a quarter and may meet at other times upon the call of the cochairs. A majority of the members of the Committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The affirmative vote of a majority of the members present at meetings of the Committee shall be necessary for action to be taken by the Committee.

All members shall serve at the will of their appointing officer. A member continues to serve until the member’s successor is appointed. A vacancy shall be filled within 30 days by the officer who made the original appointment.

History.

1999-237, s. 22(a); 2001-486, s. 2.7; 2004-129, s. 7A(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-129, s. 7A.(d), effective July 1, 2004, in subsection (a), in subdivisions (1) and (2), substituted “eight” for “five” and added the last sentence; repealed subdivisions (3) and (4), and deleted the undesignated paragraph following subdivision (4); rewrote subsection (b); deleted “who are elected officials” following “Members” in subsection (c).

§ 120-233.
Assistance; per diem; subsistence; and travel allowances.

The Committee may contract for consulting services as provided by

G.S. 120-32.02

. Upon approval of the Legislative Services Commission, the Legislative Services Officer shall assign professional and clerical staff to assist in the work of the Committee. The professional staff shall include the appropriate staff from the Fiscal Research, Legislative Analysis, Legislative Drafting, and Information Systems Divisions of the Legislative Services Office of the General Assembly. Clerical staff shall be furnished to the Committee through the offices of the Senate and the House of Representatives Supervisors of Clerks. The expenses of employment of the clerical staff shall be borne by the Committee. The Committee may meet in the Legislative Building or the Legislative Office Building upon the approval of the Legislative Services Commission.

Members of the Committee shall receive per diem, subsistence, and travel allowances as follows:

Committee members who are members of the General Assembly, at the rate established in

G.S. 120-3.1

.

Committee members who are officials or employees of the State or of local government agencies, at the rate established in

G.S. 138-6

.

All other Committee members, at the rate established in

G.S. 138-5

.

History.

1999-237, s. 22(a); 2018-142, s. 4(g).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-142, s. 4(g), effective December 15, 2018, in subsection (a), substituted “Legislative Analysis” for “Research” following “Fiscal Research.”

§ 120-234.
Committee authority.

The Committee may obtain information and data from all State officers, agents, agencies, and departments, while in discharge of its duties, under

G.S. 120-19

, as if it were a committee of the General Assembly. The provisions of

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

shall apply to the proceedings of the Committee as if it were a committee of the General Assembly. Any cost of providing information to the Committee not covered by

G.S. 120-19.3

may be reimbursed by the Committee from funds appropriated to it for its continuing study.

History.

1999-237, s. 22(a).

§ 120-235.
Committee subcommittees; noncommittee membership.

The Committee cochairs may establish subcommittees for the purpose of making special studies pursuant to its duties, and may appoint noncommittee members to serve on each subcommittee as resource persons. Resource persons shall be voting members of the subcommittee and shall receive subsistence and travel expenses in accordance with

G.S. 138-5

and

G.S. 138-6

.

History.

1999-237, s. 22(a).

§ 120-236.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 7.12(c), effective July 1, 2014.

History.

2011-145, s. 6A.14(a); 2011-391, s. 11(f); 2012-142, s. 6A.7; repealed by 2014-100, s. 7.12(c), effective July 1, 2014.

§§ 120-237 through 120-239.

Reserved for future codification purposes.